Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2230
Attorney General; enforcement.

The Attorney General may take such civil action as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of sections 71-2226 to 71-2229.

Laws 1987, LB 643, § 22;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 26.